Massachusetts, session 194th, S1818.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 100 of chapter 41 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “law” in line 31 the following
words:- This section shall also apply to any permanent crash crewman, crash boatman, fire
controlman or assistant fire controlman employed at the General Edward Lawrence Logan
International Airport, members of the Massachusetts military reservation fire department and
members of the 104th fighter wing fire department and, for the purposes of this section, the
Massachusetts Port Authority, the Massachusetts military reservation and the Barnes Air
National Guard Base shall be fire districts.
SECTION 2. Section 100B of said chapter 41, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following paragraph:-
of 2

This section shall also apply to any permanent crash crewman, crash boatman, fire
controlman or assistant fire controlman from the General Edward Lawrence Logan International
Airport, members of the Massachusetts military reservation fire department and members of the
104th fighter wing fire department who are retired under a general or special law specifically
relating to retirement for accidental disability and, for the purposes of this section, the
Massachusetts Port Authority, the Massachusetts military reservation and the Barnes Air
National Guard Base shall be fire districts.
SECTION 3. Section 94 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the words “into such service” in line 17, the following words:- or, for
members of the 104th fighter wing fire department or members of the Massachusetts military
reservation fire department, passed a physical examination on entry into service for those
departments before they were transitioned to state employment,
SECTION 4. Section 94A of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the words “into such service” in line 12, the following words:- or, for members of
the 104th fighter wing fire department or members of the Massachusetts military reservation fire
department, passed a physical examination on entry into service for those departments before
they were transitioned to state employment,
SECTION 5. Section 94B of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the words “into such service” in line 13, the following words:- or, for members of
the 104th fighter wing fire department or members of the Massachusetts military reservation fire
department, passed a physical examination on entry into service for those departments before
they were transitioned to state employment,
of 2